District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.12

Office of Taxicabs established.

(a)

There is established an Office of Taxicabs.

(b)

The Office shall provide administrative support to the Commission.

(c)

The Office shall be responsible for the execution and administration of this subchapter, and all rules, standards, rates, charges, and orders issued by the Commission.

(d)

Repealed.

(e)

The Office shall:

(1)

Repealed;

(2)

Administer all license examinations applicable to the taxicab industry;

(3)

Maintain a system of electronic public records relating to licensed owners and operators of public vehicles-for-hire and public vehicle-for-hire companies, associations, and fleets, including:

(A)

Developing, maintaining, and keeping current a body of information for public and government use relating to public vehicle-for-hire industry operations within the District, regionally, and nationwide; and

(B)

Providing statistics, analyses, studies, and projections relating to matters such as revenue, operational costs, passenger carriage, profits, practices, and technologies characterizing the public vehicle-for-hire industry;

(4)

Repealed;

(5)

Receive complaints lodged against the owners and operators of public and private vehicles-for-hire, including taxicabs, taxicab companies, associations, fleets, and dispatch services, for the violation of any rule, regulation, order, rate, or law applicable specifically to the vehicle for-hire industry;

(6)

Repealed;

(7)

Administer and enforce all rules, rates, and orders issued under the authority of the Commission applicable to taxicab companies, associations, fleets, taxicab facilities, taxi dispatch services, and the owners and operators of taxicabs;

(8)

Develop, maintain, and keep current under the direction of the Commission a body of information for public and Commission use relating to taxi industry operations within the District, regionally, and nationwide, which information shall include, but not be limited to, statistics, analyses, studies, and projections relating to matters such as revenue, operational costs, passenger carriage, profits, practices, and technologies characterizing the taxi industry;

(9)

Perform any other administrative functions necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter which are assigned to the Office by the Commission;

(10)

Inspect public vehicles-for-hire for compliance with regulations established by the Commission and the Department of Motor Vehicles for safety requirements;

(11)

Provide street enforcement of the rules and regulations of the Commission through the use of vehicle inspection officers who are civil enforcement officers;

(12)

Collect a fee to recover the actual costs of producing and distributing official Commission vehicle decals, stickers, and information placards; and

(13)

Establish within the Office a transportation liaison who shall serve as liaison between the Office and the District Department of Transportation on policies related to transportation.

(f)

The Commission shall employ no fewer than 20 vehicle inspection officers to enforce the laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to public and private vehicles-for-hire. A primary function of vehicle inspection officers shall be to ensure the proper provision of service and to support safety through street enforcement efforts, including traffic stops of public and private vehicles-for-hire, pursuant to protocol prescribed by the Commission

(g)

Nothing in this section shall abrogate the authority of officers of the Metropolitan Police Force to enforce and issue citations relating to taxicab requirements.

(h)

(1)

A proposed suspension or revocation by the Office of a license issued under the authority of this subchapter shall not take effect until a final decision is rendered by the Commission upon a timely appeal taken by a licensee or, if no appeal is taken, upon the lapse of the period specified, by rule, for appeal.

(2)

The Office may immediately suspend or revoke a license issued under the authority of this subchapter where the Office has determined that the operator of a vehicle poses an imminent danger to the public. Within 3 business days of the issuance by the Office of an immediate suspension or revocation, an administrative hearing shall be held before the Commission, or the matter may be referred to the Office of Administrative Hearings, pursuant to Chapter 18A of Title 2 [§ 2-1831.01 et seq.].

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 13, 33 DCR 703
May 1, 1990, D.C. Law 8-107, § 2(d), 37 DCR 1623
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 501(f), 43 DCR 4569
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, § 210, 54 DCR 903
Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-184, § 2(m), 59 DCR 9431
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-197, § 2(f), 61 DCR 12430

Cross References

Licensing of vehicles for hire, see § 47-2829.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-303 and § 50-2536.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1712.
2001 Ed., § 50-312.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-279 added subsec. (e)(10).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-184 rewrote (e)(3) and (e)(10); added (e) (11), (12), and (13); and rewrote (f) and (h)(2).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-197, in (e)(5), substituted “owners and operators of public and private vehicles-for-hire, including taxicabs, taxicab companies, associations, fleets, and dispatch services” for “owners and operators of taxicabs, taxicab companies, associations, fleets, and dispatch services” and substituted “vehicle for-hire industry” for “taxicab industry”; substituted “vehicle inspection officers” for “public vehicle inspection officers” in (e)(11) and (f); and substituted “public and private vehicles-for-hire” for “public vehicles-for-hire” throughout (f).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 501(f) of Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-226, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2584).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 501(f) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-302, July 25, 1996, 43 DCR 4181), see § 501(f) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-429, October 29, 1996, 43 DCR 6151), and see § 501(f) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-2, February 19, 1997, 44 DCR 1590).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Hacker’s License Appeal Board abolished: Section 23(a) of D.C. Law 6-97 provided that the Hacker’s License Appeal Board established by Commissioners’ Order 68-59, effective August 15, 1968, is abolished. Section 23(b) of D.C. Law 6-97 provided that the Commission shall be the successor to the Board and any complaint, proceeding, or matter pending before the Board on the effective date of this section shall be a complaint, proceeding, or matter of the Commission. Section 24(b) of D.C. Law 6-97 provided that §§ 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 20, 21, 22, and 23 shall take effect 1 year after March 25, 1986.

Section 1001 of D.C. Law 11-198 provided that titles I, II, III, V, and VI and sections 405 and 406 of the act shall apply after September 30, 1996.

Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-184 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7007 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-184, § 7.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-197: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-197 provided, in part, that §§ 1, 2, 3, and 4 of the act shall apply as of March 10, 2015.